Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,137
Motor vehicle insurance database; information required.

Each insurance company doing business in this state shall provide information shown on each automobile liability policy issued in this state as required by the department pursuant to sections 60-3,136 to 60-3,139 for inclusion in the motor vehicle insurance database in a form and manner acceptable to the department. Any person who qualifies as a self-insurer under sections 60-562 to 60-564 or any person who provides financial responsibility under sections 75-392 to 75-3,100 shall not be required to provide information to the department for inclusion in the motor vehicle insurance database.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 137;

Laws 2007, LB358, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 24.